Wyoming statutes. Title 35 Public Health and Safety
Article 2. Air Quality
§ 35-11-213.
Restrictions on state regulations related to greenhouse gas emissions.

Effective March 31, 1999, neither the department nor the council shall propose or promulgate any new rule or regulation intended in whole or in part to reduce emissions as called for by the Kyoto Protocol, from the residential, commercial, industrial, electric utility, transportation, agricultural, energy or mining sectors.

In the absence of a resolution or other act of the legislature approving same, the director of the department shall not submit to the United States environmental protection agency or to any other agency of the federal government any legally enforceable commitments related to the Kyoto Protocol.

Nothing in this section shall be construed to limit or to impede state or private participation in any on-going voluntary initiatives to reduce emissions of greenhouse gases, including, but not limited to, the United States environmental protection agency’s green lights program, the United States department of energy’s climate challenge program and similar state and federal initiatives relying on voluntary participation.

This section shall remain in effect until repealed by an act of the Wyoming legislature or until ratification of the Kyoto Protocol by the United States senate and enactment of federal legislation implementing the Kyoto Protocol.

Notwithstanding the provisions of subsections (a) through (d) of this section and pursuant to the provisions of subsections (e) through (k) of this section, the department and council shall adopt regulations to amend Wyoming’s Clean Air Act state implementation plan and Wyoming’s Title V operating permit program to the extent necessary to obtain state primacy over the regulation of greenhouse gases for those sources that would otherwise be subject to federal regulation for greenhouse gases by the United States environmental protection agency. The department and council may promulgate new source performance standards for greenhouse gases that are no more stringent than federal greenhouse gas new source performance standards.

In no event shall any greenhouse gas emission regulations, new source performance standards or potential to emit thresholds promulgated pursuant to subsection (e) of this section be more stringent than those imposed or required by federal law. Regulations under subsection (e) of this section shall only regulate those gases identified by the United States environmental protection agency as greenhouse gases.

Notwithstanding W.S. 35-11-203(a), the department and the council are authorized to determine by regulation potential to emit thresholds for greenhouse gas emissions which are no more stringent than those imposed or required by federal law.

The department may submit an amended state implementation plan providing for regulation of greenhouse gases to the United States environmental protection agency for approval.

and (ii) Repealed by Laws 2013, ch. 39, § 2.

Subsections (e) through (k) of this section and the authority granted in subsection (e) of this section to the department and the council to promulgate and adopt greenhouse gas regulations and all regulations adopted pursuant to subsection (e) of this section are repealed upon the occurrence of any one (1) of the following events:

The United States congress enacts a law prohibiting the United States environmental protection agency from regulating greenhouse gases; or

A federal court issues a final judgment prohibiting the United States environmental protection agency from regulating greenhouse gas emissions from stationary sources.

As used in this section, the term “final judgment” means a judgment issued by a federal court that is no longer subject to potential or ongoing appeal to any federal court with jurisdiction over the court judgment.

The governor shall certify to the secretary of state the occurrence of any act which repeals subsections (e) through (k) of this section pursuant to subsection (j) of this section. The effective date of such repeal of subsections (e) through (k) of this section shall be the date the governor’s certification is filed with the secretary of state.

and (ii) Repealed by Laws 2013, ch. 39, § 2.

History.

Laws 1999, ch. 85, § 1; 2012, ch. 11, § 1; 2013 ch. 39, §§ 1, 2, effective February 14, 2013.

The 2012 amendment,

added (e) through (m).

Laws 2012, ch. 11 § 2, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 6, 2012.

The 2013 amendment,

in (e) substituted the last sentence “The department and council may promulgate new source performance standards for greenhouse gases that are no more stringent than federal greenhouse gas new source performance standards” for “Pursuant to the provisions of W.S. 16 3 104(b)(i), the regulations promulgated and adopted pursuant to the authority granted in this subsection shall be effective on the date the department receives authority to submit an amended state implementation plan to the United States environmental protection agency as provided by subsection (h) of this section,” in (f) added “, new source performance standards” following “gas emission regulations,” in (h) substituted the period for “only after the occurrence of the earlier of the following events;” and in (m) substituted “repeals subsections (e) through (k) of this section pursuant to subsection (j) of this section. The effective date of such repeal of subsections (e) through (k) of this section shall be the date the governor's certification is filed with the secretary of state.” for the semicolon.

Laws 2013, ch. 39, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo Const. Approved February 14, 2013.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (i) or (l) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Carbon sequestration. —

Laws 2001, ch. 173, §§ 1 through 6, as amended by Laws 2002, Sp. Sess., ch. 75, § 1, and Laws 2004, ch. 38, § 1, creates a carbon sequestration advisory committee, which is to assist the director of the department of agriculture in assessing agricultural and forest lands in Wyoming for past carbon sequestration and future carbon sequestration potential, recommend policies or programs to enhance the ability of Wyoming agricultural and forest landowners to participate in systems of carbon trading, encourage the production of educational and advisory materials regarding carbon sequestration and carbon or greenhouse emissions trading, and identify and recommend areas of research needed to better understand and quantify the processes of carbon sequestration on agricultural and forest lands. On or before December 1, 2001, the director, in consultation with the advisory committee, is to prepare a report to the legislature, to include (1) the potential for greenhouse emissions regulation, (2) the potential for development of a system of carbon emission trading or markets for sequestered carbon, (3) agricultural and forest practices, management systems or lands uses which increase stored soil carbon and minimize carbon dioxide or other greenhouse emissions, (4) methods for measuring and modeling net carbon sequestration and greenhouse emissions reduction, and legislation to define and protect property rights in carbon sequestration and greenhouse emissions, (5) areas of scientific uncertainty with respect to quantifying and understanding greenhouse emission reductions or soil carbon sequestration, and (6) recommendations. The act creates the carbon sequestration assessment cash fund to carry out the purposes of this act and appropriates $35,600 from the budget reserve account to the department of agriculture for such purposes. Additionally, it appropriates from the general fund to the department of agriculture $35,600, or as much thereof as is necessary, for purposes of this act. Notwithstanding §§

9-2-1008

, 9-2-1012(e) and 9-2-207(a), any monies remaining from this appropriation shall not lapse, but are appropriated to the department for purposes of the act.

Laws 2001, ch. 173, § 8, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 1, 2001. Section 7, as amended by Laws 2002, Sp. Sess., ch. 75, § 1, and Laws 2004, ch. 38, § 1, repeals the act effective July 1, 2009.

Law reviews. —

For article, “State and Regional Efforts, In Wyoming and Beyond, To Reduce Greenhouse Gas Emissions”,
see 7 Wyo L. Rev 269 (2008).

For article, “State and Local Governments Address the Twin Challenges of Climate Change and Energy Alternatives”,see 23 Nat. Resources & Env't 9 (2008).

§ 35-11-214.
Emission trading programs.

The department through rule and regulation may establish intrastate, participate in interstate, or establish intrafacility emissions trading programs. Any trading program established shall be consistent with the Clean Air Act and regulations promulgated thereunder, and consistent with ambient air quality standards.

History.

Laws 2003, ch. 146, § 1.

Clean Air Act. —

The Clean Air Act is codified at 42 U.S.C. § 7401 et seq.